Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-506
Funds, property, and services; acceptance and use.

The State Archaeology Office may accept, use, disburse, and administer all funds or other property, services, and money allotted to it for purposes of the Nebraska Archaeological Resources Preservation Act and may prescribe the conditions under which such funds, property, services, or money will be accepted and administered.

Laws 2005, LB 211, § 6.